Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-104
Basic local exchange rate, defined.

Basic local exchange rate means the flat monthly charge for an access line, whether the telecommunications service is provided on a flat or measured basis, imposed by a telecommunications company for basic local exchange service but does not include any charge or tax imposed by or resulting from action by a governmental body which is billed by a telecommunications company to its customers.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 5.